src/morphology/phonology.twolc
"LT -> SH part 2 for V3B"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 d:h <=> l: %{a%}:0 ( Tones ) %>: ( %>: ) _ ;

"LT -> SH in reduplicative plurals, pt 1"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 %{C2%}:s <=> l Tones %>: %{N%}:0 a _ %>:  t: ;

"V2 {y} deletion"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 %{y%}:0 <=> _ ( Tones ) %>:+ y ;
              y _ ;
              i i _ ( Tones ) %>:+ Cons;
              i _ ( Tones ) %>:+ Cons;
              _ %>: WordBoundary ;

"Definite suffix -k to -g next to preceding voiced"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 k:g <=> [ :VC | Vowels ] PostN _ Vowels ;
          %{C2%}:g %>: _ Vowels ;
    where VC in (g y w) ;

"t:0 before d h"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 CD:0 <=> d h Tones %>: %{N%}:0 _ Vowels ;
    where CD in (d t) ;

"t/d alternation - definite suffix, V1"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 t:d <=> 
         ! In verbs
         TDalt (%{%-V%}:0) ( Tones ) %>: _ ;
         i     (%{%-V%}:0) ( Tones ) %>: _ ;
         ! Definite suffix: dhexda, xuquuqda
         TDalt  PostN _ Vowels ;
         Vowels PostN _ Vowels ;

!! TODO: dukaammo
! baabuurro, dukaammo, albaabbo
! Except words like guri/bangi, which have y.

"Declension 2: -C doubling in plural"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 %{C2%}:Cz <=> :Cz PostN _ ( %>: ) PlVowels ;
    where Cz in (b d dh l r n m)
    PlVowels in (a o) ;

!! TODO: This rule is currently conflicting with the next one.

! bangiyo
! TODO: guriyo, guryo
"Declension 2: -y insertion after back sounds and fricatives; and after -i"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 %{C2%}:y <=> Cz PostN _ ( %>: ) PlVowels ; 
              i PostN _ ( %>: ) PlVowels ;
    where Cz in (w c q x s j)
    PlVowels in (a o) ;


! miisas, qoysas, afaf
"Declension 4: Plural Partial Reduplication"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 %{C2%}:Cz <=> Cz PostN a _ ; 
    where Cz in Cons
    matched ;

"Declension 4: Plural Partial Reduplication %{m}"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 %{C2%}:m <=> %{m%}: PostN _ %>: a ;

"Declension 4: C2->n in m contexts"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 %{C2%}:n <=> :m Tones %>: %{N%}:0 a _ %>: [ k t n ] ;
               :m ( Tones ) %>: %{N%}:0 ( Vowels ) _ ;

! yar´>{N}{C3A}{C3B}{C3C}>#

! "Declension 4: Plural Full Reduplication - pt. 1"
!  %{C3A%}:Cz <=> Cz WordChars WordChars ( Tones ) %>: %{N%}:0 _ ;
!     matched ;

! "Declension 4: Plural Full Reduplication - pt. 2"
!  %{C3B%}:Cz <=> WordChars Cz WordChars ( Tones ) %>: %{N%}:0 _ ;
!     where Cz in Cons
!     matched ;
! 
! "Declension 4: Plural Full Reduplication - pt. 3"
!  %{C3C%}:Cz <=> WordChars WordChars Cz ( Tones ) %>: %{N%}:0 _ ;
!     where Cz in Cons
!     matched ;

! guriyo

"-y- insertion in plurals"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 0:y <=> i PostN _ VowB ;
    where VowB in (a o u e) ;

! disallow yy
"Disallow yy"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 y:0 <=> _ [PostN | %>:] y ;


!! Doesn't work with wuxu, where k has been deleted.
!! Doesn't work with magicii, magucu, but should optionally. magacii and magicii, etc are both possible

! Opacity?  wax+ku -> wax+u -> wux+u

"Declension 6: final vowel"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  a:o <=> _ PostN WordBoundary ;
            _ PostN o ;


 
"Declension V1: magacow / magacaabay / magacawday, shorten a"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 a:0 <=> a _ %>: w d ;

"Delete preceding a"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 a:0 <=>  _ %{%-a%}:0 ;

! TRY: { WordChars - O }

! _ Tones %>: NOUN [WordChars - O] ; 

!! !! AllBoundaries \?:WordChars
! TODO: could also be i/a alternations in this declension

"Declension 7: {-e} delete"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 e:0 <=> _ %{%-e%}:0 ;

"Declension 7: final vowel"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 %{e%}:a <=> _ PostN WordChars ;

"Declension 7: final vowel in final position"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 %{e%}:e <=> _ PostN WordBoundary ;



!!!
!!!
!! !!Verbal Rules
!!!
!!!

! {-I}:0 for derivations

"V2A -> V3B derivations, delete -i"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 i:0 <=> Vowels Cons _ %{%-I%}:0 ;

"V2A -> V3B derivations, depalatization"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 j:g <=> _ i:0 %{%-I%}:0 ;

! {-V}:0 for concatenative v deletion set.

! "V1: b mutation"
!  b:w <=> _ %>: Cons ;


! TODO: xfst  analyzes both, generates one for tag, but not for bex
! bax+V+Inf, tag+V+Inf

"V1: a/e umlaut before i/e"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  %{ae%}:e <=> Cons _ Cons ( Tones ) [%>: | %>:+ ] i ;
               Cons _ Cons ( Tones ) [%>: | %>:+ ] e ;


"V1: a/e umlaut before a"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  %{ae%}:a <=> Cons _ Cons ( Tones ) [%>: | %>:+ ] a ;
               Cons _ Cons ( Tones ) [%>: | %>:+ ] Cons ;


! "V1: a/e umlaut before i/e"
!   %{ae%}:a <=> Cons _ Cons ( Tones ) [%>: | %>:+ ] [ :I | :E ] ;

! TODO: maqallay
"V1, D3: Vowel deletion"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 Vz:0 <=>
          ! V1 
          ! Cons+ for korodhay, etc
          %^:0 _ Cons+ ( Tones ) %>:+ Vowels ; 
          ! D3
          %^: _ Cons PostN Vowels ; 
          ! With no %^ marker, but {-V} instead
          Cons _ Cons ( Tones ) %{%-V%}:0 %>:+ [ Vowels + 0 ] ;

    where Vz in Vowels ;

    ! maqlay            maqalnay/maqallay
    ! maqashay            maqasheen
    ! maqlay            maqleen
    ! maqashay        


    ! arkay            aragnay
    ! aragtay            aragteen
    ! arkay            arkeen
    ! aragtay        

    ! inf:     1P       2P          INF
    ! -lan    -lmay    -lantay      -lmi
    ! -dub    -dbay    -dubtay      -dbi
    ! -ran    -rmay    -rantay      -rmi
    
    ! ran{-V}>0 -> rm
    ! ran{-V}>i -> rmi
    ! ran{-V}>t -> rant
    
    ! TODO: seems to be optional?
    ! echo "gulaalan+V+3SgM+Ind+Past" | xsomgen
    ! -> gulaalanay, gulaalmay


! TODO: is there a better place to do this? After twolc?
"V1: Simplification of dhd to dh (t)"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 t:0 <=> d h ( Tones ) %>: _ ;


! "V4: Vowel deletion without preceding marker before vowels and epsilon"
!  Vz:0 <=> Cons _ Cons %{%-V%}:0 %>: [Vowels + 0] ;
!    where Vz in Vowels ;
 
"V1: n/m when deleted vowel results in C0n"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 n:m <=> Cons Vowels:0 _ ( Tones ) %{%-V%}:0 %>:+ [ Vowels + 0 ] ;


 
!!!
!!  !!V2A
!!!

!! tbw.

!!!
!!  !!V2B
!!!

"V2B: y-insertion"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 0:y <=> [:Vowels - :y] ( Tones ) %>: _ %>: :Vowels ; 

"V2B: ey before consonants"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 %{e%}:y <=> _ ( Tones ) %>: [:Cons - :y] ; 

"V2B: ee before y"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 %{e%}:e <=> _ ( Tones ) %>: :y ; 

"V2B: Remove e"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 %{e%}:0 <=> _ ( Tones ) %>: :y :Cons ;


     ! PAST

     ! sameeyay        sameynay
     ! sameysay        sameyseen / sameysid
     ! sameeyay        sameeyeen
     ! sameysay        

     ! PROG

     ! sameynayaa
     ! etc...



!!!
!!  V3A
!!!




!!!
!! !!V3B
!!!

!! Following rules are for the funky things that happen with 1Sg, 3SgM, 3Pl
!! Basically, disallowed d_d, so it gets simplified to t
!!   

!!{{{
!! wada>d>aa#        wada>nn>aa#
!!  wada>t>aa#        wada>d>aan#
!! wada>d>aa#        wada>t>aan#
!!  wada>t>aa#

!! wataa                        wadannaa
!!  wadataa                        wadataan
!! wataa                        wataan
!!  wadataa


!! fura>d>aa#        fura>nn>aa#
!!  fura>t>aa#        fura>d>aan#
!! fura>d>aa#        fura>t>aan#
!!  fura>t>aa#

!! furtaa                        furannaa
!!  furataa                        furataan
!! furtaa                        furtaan
!!  furataa
!!}}}

!! Also another type: TODO: merge

!!{{{
!! sigo+V+IV+1Sg+Ind+Past   sig{a}>d>ay#
!! sigo+V+IV+2Sg+Ind+Past   sig{a}>t>ay#

!! sigtay
!! sigatay

!! But: obd / cd / hd / qd / xd / yd
!! Note: bt / obd
!!}}}

"V3B: %{o%}:o finally"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 a:o <=> _ ( Tones ) %>: WordBoundary ; 

"V3B: %{o%}:0 in d _ d"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 a:0 <=> Vowels CorCons: _ ( Tones ) %>: d: ;
     where CorCons in (d r s) ;

"V3B: d dissimilation"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 d:0 <=> Vowels d: a:0 ( Tones ) %>: _ %>: ;

! TODO: write test
"V3B: d dissimilation w/ cor" 
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 d:t <=> Vowels [CorCons: - d:] [ a:0 ] ( Tones ) %>: _ %>: ;
         Vowels NonCorCons %{a%}:0 ( Tones ) %>: _ ;
         Vowels s h [ a:0 %{a%}:0 ] ( Tones ) %>: _ ;
         ! arrumo -> arruntay Nasal
         Vowels :n %{a%}:0 ( Tones ) %>: _ ;

     where CorCons in (d r s)
           NonCorCons in (b f g n q r) 
           ;

"V3B: d dissimilation 2" 
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 d:t <=> Vowels _ a:0 ( Tones ) %>: d:0 %>: ; 

! TODO: write test: buqday / buqatay ; sirtay / siratay

"V3B: root {a} deletion before suffixes with -d"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 %{a%}:0 <=> _ ( Tones ) %>: d: ;

"V3B: otherwise"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 %{a%}:a <=> _ ( Tones ) %>: t: ;

 
!! !!  General Rules

"Vowel reduction VVV -> VV"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 V1:0 <=> _ AllBoundaries (%>:) V1 V1 ;
  where V1 in Vowels
    matched ;

! TODO: write test: sakhraan / sakhraamo
"m->n in codas"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 Cm:n <=> _ ( Tones ) %>: [ WordBoundary | k: | t: ] ; 
           _ PostN [ WordBoundary | k: | t: ] ;
     ! V3B 1P arrumo -> arruntay
           _ %{a%}:0 ( Tones ) %>: d: ;
           ! Before clitics
           _ PostN %>: [ Cons: - [ k: | g: ] ] ;
     where Cm in (m %{m%}) ;

"m->m in codas"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 %{m%}:m <=> _ ( Tones ) %>: ( %{N%}:0 ) [ Vowels | :m ] ; 
           _ PostN :m ;

"Optional m doubling"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 0:m => _ %{m%}:m ;

! magac´´%>%{N%}ku# 
"Velar deletion after Back, but avoiding digraphs"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 k:0 <=> [Letters - [d | s | k ]] Back PostN _ ;

! Final lenition appears to be final voicing because of the orthography.
! {b d g} represent lenis stops, and {p t k} represent fortis stops.
! Lenition occurs in syllable codas, leading to alternations 
! such as arkaa / aragtaa

! Some literature may refer to this as final voicing.

! TODO: write test: arag- / ark- 

"Final lenition."
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 Cv:Cx <=> Vowels _ ( Tones ) %>: ( %{N%}:0 ) [ WordBoundary | :Cons ] ;
  where Cx in (b d g)
        Cv in (p t k)
        matched ; 

"-ee changes to -ye after other vowels"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 %{E%}:y <=> [Vowels - o] %>: _ e ;

"-ee changes to -e after y"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 %{E%}:0 <=> y %>: _ e ;

"-ee clitic deletes preceding -o"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 Cv:0 <=> _ %>: %{E%}:e ;
  where Cv in ( o ) ;

! dhammaan
"progressive nasal assimilation across morphological boundaries"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 n:m <=> m %>: _ ;

!!€ primus%>s
!!€ primus00

!!€grís%>s
!!€grís00

!!$grís%>s
!!$grís0s

! vim: set ts=4 sw=4 tw=0 syntax=lexc :
